  
SEAN HANNITY, HOST: And welcome to "Hannity." And this is a "FOX News Alert." The FBI will not rule out terrorism as a possible motive in today's deadly  shooting rampage in San Bernardino, California, which left 14 dead, 17 people  injured.    Tonight, we have dramatic new video of the gun battle between police and the  suspects earlier tonight. Watch this.       
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Something's going on! Something's going on! There they go. They're after that guy. They're after that guy! Guns! Gunshots! Gunshots!  Gunshots!did you see that?   
UNIDENTIFIED MALE:shots?  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Yes. There were gunshots -- oh! Oh, we better get down, bro.       
HANNITY: Now, police say two of the suspects were killed in that shootout and have been identified, one man, one woman. And a third person was detained at the  scene, but authorities have not said if this person was involved.    Adam Housley obtained that video exclusively for FOX News. He's live on the  ground where that gun battle took place with the police -- Adam.   
ADAM HOUSLEY, FOX CORRESPONDENT: Yes, Sean, in fact, the gun battle began behind me. David Espinosawas the witness who shot that video.    I'm going to step away. It's dark. You're going to see it's a little bit grainy,  but you can see what's going on. They've moved all of us back now pretty  significantly, maybe, oh, a half -- no, a quarter mile from where the actual SUV  is located. You can see the flashing lights there right now.    They've been taking their time with the vehicle and that area because they were  concerned of a explosive device possibly being on that location. We do know that  they've been able to get a lot closer, and I believe they've been able to get a  lot more out of that truck.    You're seeing the video now of what took place in between where I'm standing and  that -- those lights you saw a moment ago. David shot that video. They had come  out -- the factory actually shut down for the day. People were going to go home  because of the uncertainty that was in San Bernardino throughout the midday and  afternoon about these shooters. No one knew where they were or what had happened  here.    And then as that was happening, they walk out to see what they thought was  police pulling over a car for speeding at about 40 miles an hour on a street  that -- that would have been fast for. And all of a sudden, the back window shot  out, as you heard. Then you hear about 100 yards later, more gunfire going back  and forth between both unmarked police cars and regular police cars and then --  and the suspects, as well.    And then about 150 yards further is where it all culminated, just past the  stoplight where the SUV came to rest and the female and male suspects were  killed. And that is where the investigation continues.    Not long after that -- we weren't very far away -- in fact, you can see the  truck, you can see the intersection. We were probably only 150 yards away  ourselves when we all began to be moved back. We thought it was because they  were expanding the crime scene and wanted to make sure they got all the  witnesses kept in.    But what was happening, Sean, is there was a barricaded situation not far from  here, just basically a block or two to the south of where that was located. And  that was ongoing for some time, as well.    So a very tense situation even here now. No one really knows if these three  potential -- the other person that was talked about being in custody -- are  these the only people involved? Is that third person even involved?    We of course, have a situation in Redlands ongoing, so there are -- and you hear  random police sirens around. I will tell you this, the police helicopters have  gone down. That's something new. In the last maybe half an hour, there had been  up to three up, my count, even as recently as a half an hour ago.    We still hear random sirens all around this side of town. We're on the eastern  part of San Bernardino, which is roughly a mile-and-a-half from where the  murders took place, Sean.    I'll tell you this also. We got tipped off by -- that one of the suspects that  was killed was a female. We've also been tipped off of some names. I know you've  heard the names, as well.    I talked to federal law enforcement and local law enforcement involved with this  case directly right now. The issue is, they're not getting any directive from  Washington or anywhere else. This is within their own agencies.    They know it's a sensitive situation in this country right now. They're trying  to determine exactly the names, as you might imagine. At least one, they  believe, could be Middle Eastern.    But part of the reason why they were holding back, Sean, is they wanted to get  into that SUV, ensure that those IDS, or any information that might be in there,  would help them secure what those names are. So that's why they're being very  delicate, at least the people that I know involved in the case, that's why  they're being very delicate. And it's understandably why they're doing that.    But they have -- one individual I spoke to, you know, has seen, obviously, the  two dead suspects, and says, you know, that obviously, there are some concerns  there, but they cannot connect that dot yet, Sean.   
HANNITY: Well, the FBI spokesman was very clear they're not ruling out terrorism. Now you're reporting that, in fact...   
HOUSLEY: Right.  
HANNITY: ... one of the -- one of the people involved, one of those shot and killed, is Middle Eastern, so I'm sure that'll raise some questions in some  people's minds.   
HOUSLEY: Well...  
HANNITY: Why no description...  
HOUSLEY: The name...  
HANNITY: Why no -- go ahead.  
HOUSLEY: The key -- yes, sorry, Sean. You were hitting the point right there. The key is the name. It doesn't mean they're Middle Eastern. You know, it could  be an American citizen with a Middle Eastern name.    It's the name and the potentially again the look, unfortunately -- and I'm not  saying that's what it is, but they have to take all that into account. You know,  you take into account if it's a young white man, you take into account if it's a  man of Middle Eastern descent. You take into account whatever the person is.    And in this case, because of the delicate nature, because of the situation going  on with ISIS, Middle Eastern terrorism, all that situation that's happening,  they have to be -- they have to make sure they get it right and they want to  make sure they get it right the first time. And that's why I'm told they're  being so sensitive with this.    But yes, one of the names they were originally given and what they believed  before they got into that SUV -- and I haven't talked to the person since they  got into the SUV -- was a Middle Eastern name.   
HANNITY: All right...  
HOUSLEY: And the individual, who was responding to the scene who saw the cell phone video from one of the other agents, said that one of the suspects looked  Middle Eastern in face. But that doesn't mean that the person was, and he hadn't  seen him yet in person. He was going off on his situation on coming here to the  scene.   
HANNITY: Well, what do you know about the ongoing FBI raid at the home where they suspect that these two people lived?   
HOUSLEY: Well, one of our producers, Dan Gallo, is out there right now. He said he heard an improvised explosion device, meaning it was a device done by  authorities. It was planned, I should say, planned explosion, as if they were  destroying something. Doesn't mean that was a bomb. A lot of times, they'll blow  up something that might appear to be such just to save everybody the hassle of  having to get near it.    and there's obviously that going on right now. That's still fluid, as well.  Redlands is not far from here. You got to believe that if that just happened  recently, that to me intimates they probably got into the SUV and got some more  information out of it.    I know that one of the issues they were having, Sean, is they felt there was  more information inside and they wanted to ensure the safety before their  investigators got in and were able to go through any personal artifacts that  might be in there.    They saw some inside. That's one reason why they were being delicate with that.  So was it a purse, was it a wallet? I don't know? They won't go into that kind  of detail. But that's potentially what resulted in Redlands. At least that may  have helped them with that part of the investigation.    Sean, as I was told by one of the other officers -- I talked to somebody, same  person that told me earlier that they were -- before they had this chase and  before all this went down, they said, you know, We have to go out there with the  belief that we have three people with assault rifles that are wearing tactical  gear. And that's what they had, at least in this case, at least with the two  here.    And so that same individual says, you know, even though it looks like we might  have these two and possibly a third contained, there still may be other folks  along with them. We don't know yet, Adam. And there's still a lot of  investigation to do.    And really, as you know, Sean, in these situations, that is the truth. I mean,  is there a cell here? Was it workplace violence that happened to be someone with  a Middle Eastern name? There's a lot of variables that have to be taken into  account. And in this situation in the world right now, you've got to be very  delicate with that. And that's what I think they're doing in this case.    And I can understand why, especially considering they don't want to make a  mistake because then, of course, that really will come back with a lot of  backlash and political stuff that they don't want to deal with. They just want  to get it right the first time.   
HANNITY: All right, Adam Housley, a lot of unanswered questions. We'll be checking in with Adam throughout the night tonight.   
HOUSLEY: Absolutely.  
HANNITY: Joining us now on the ground, also in San Bernardino, California, is our own Jonathan Hunt. Jonathan, can you tell us more about what's going on in  the -- in terms of the FBI raid of this home?   
JONATHAN HUNT, FOX CORRESPONDENT: Yes, Sean, the focus is on one particular property in Redlands. Now, that location about five miles from the original  shooting incident, where those 14 people were gunned down and killed, another 17  at least injured.    Now, what's going on in Redlands right now is that police and other law  enforcement personnel moving very deliberately, very slowly into that property.  Our producer, Dan Gallo, was on the ground and sent us some video earlier of a  robotic vehicle going towards the front door of that property.    Dan also reported hearing what he described as a detonation, that -- his thought  was that that sounded like they were blowing up something that they had found in  or around that property.    Now, the property, as we understand it, is connected to one of the two suspects  who were shot and killed in that fierce gun battle with the police when they  found and followed the dark SUV that they believe the suspects were in. They  were fired on from that SUV. Cops fired back, and as I said, the male and female  suspects within that SUV were both killed.    Now, one of those -- and we don't know which one he was or even if it was both  of them -- were connected to this residence in Redlands. That's why they went  there. Obviously, you have heard the police chief talking all day about the  possibility of booby traps, the possibility of pipe bombs. That's why they're  moving very carefully.    One other point on the question of pipe bombs, Sean. We had a news conference a  short time ago with authorities here, and they said that a piece of pipe of some  description was thrown from that SUV at some point. But they said -- and these  are their words -- it was not an explosive device, Sean.   
HANNITY: All right, Jonathan. Thank you so much. We appreciate it.   The FBI is not, as we said, ruling out terrorism as a motive for today's deadly  attack. Joining us now in Washington with more on that is our own Catherine  Herridge. Catherine, as more information comes in, it seems more and more likely  this investigation is moving into that area that this could be a possible terror  attack.   
CATHERINE HERRIDGE, FOX CORRESPONDENT: Well, Sean, based on the evidence so far, a U.S. government official recently told FOX News that the central or prime  assailant in this case is a U.S. citizen. They did not provide more detail on  the suspect.    Now, for the last three to four hours, we've been working on a name here at FOX  News. It's a foreign-sounding name, if you will. We were originally told that it  had washed out. What we now understand is that when they ran that name against  the terror watch list, they did not have any positive hits. But at this hour,  we're told that that may well be the name of one of the suspects. We're seeking  a second source on that before we broadcast that name here at FOX News.    In Washington, the way the evening has played out is that the homeland security  secretary, Jeh Johnson, has been monitoring events, getting regular updates.  Same pattern, if you will, with President Obama, who's been getting regular  updates from his White House counterterrorism adviser, Lisa Monaco.    And there are a handful of facts that have everyone's attention here from an  investigative point of view. One is the wearing of this assault- type clothing.  The second is the use of assault weapons, rifles, as well as handguns, and the  possible use of these improvised explosive devices. All of this speaks to a  certain level of premeditation.    And then, finally, as we heard at that news conference, the growing involvement  of the FBI -- one of our FBI contacts here in Washington this evening was  working to confirm if, in fact, the FBI was going to become the lead agency in  this case. If that turns out to be true...   
HANNITY: Hey, Catherine...  
HERRIDGE: ... that would be the strongest indicator of terrorism.  
HANNITY: If I could just interrupt you for a second? Please forgive me. What we are seeing now is one of the assailantsat the apartment which Jonathan  Hunt was describing. You can see the robotic device going in. Obviously, the  police saw something there that indicates that there might be some type of booby  trap, some type of IED device. And I'm sure out of an abundance of caution, that  is being sent in for the protection of the...   
HERRIDGE: Well, that's correct.  
HANNITY: ... officers prior to the investigation But that is a live shot of that robotic piece of equipment going into that apartment.    You can go back to your report, Catherine.   
HERRIDGE: Sure.  
HANNITY: But we now have learned two things, potentially a Middle Eastern-looking man, a foreign-sounding name that you're looking into. There  have been initial reports that this could have been some type of workplace  violence incident. Somebody went out of a party angry. They may have come back.  That seems less likely now as more information's coming in as time goes on.   
HERRIDGE: Well, as we heard at the news conference, that was one of the specific questions. The sheriff confirmed that there had been some sort of disagreement  or altercation at that community meeting. The individual had left. But it was  not clear to them, despite earlier reporting, that this individual returned  along with at least two others with their -- with their weapons.    Just to go back to that apartment shot, if you will, what a standard procedure  in this case is to use one of these robotic devices, if you will, to go in and  try and determine whether there are explosives, or it has been booby trapped.    What we gathered from the earlier news conference is that there was the use of  some kind of explosive device with the suspects, so they have to assume the  vehicle, the apartment, the addresses associated with these suspects may well  contain other explosives or booby traps, as well.    But the kind of surveillance, if you will, or situational awareness the FBI can  have on that property goes well beyond the robot that you're seeing right there.  Once the bureau makes a decision to focus on an address, they essentially can  get it inside what I would call this sort of electronic box.    And what I mean by that is that they will be accessing the phone system, the  wi-fi system, any kind of security camera system, putting their own probes into  that location to get a better, as I said, situational awareness of what is  inside that apartment building.    Just a final point. The FBI and local police have a lot more information then  they're making public. You heard that from Adam and you also heard that from  Jonathan Hunt.    I know that one of the things that's happening at this hour is that the FBI has  asked their counterterrorism contacts to start taking at least one of the names  and doing what they call an electronic scrub. That means that they look at  social media, they look at phone records, they look at anything that speaks to a  digital footprint for this individual to understand who their network of  associates are, as well as their activities leading up to today's events.    So we have the very visible part of the investigation that you can see now, this  going -- the raid of this apartment, the search of the SUV, and then we have  this sort of unseen chapter to the investigation, as well.   
HANNITY: All right, Catherine Herridge, thanks so much.  
HERRIDGE: You're welcome.  
HANNITY: We are getting more information. We are now told that our producers, our reporters on the ground outside of that apartment complex are now being told  to stand back, that they view this as a direct threat. The police have detected  that something is inside of that apartment where you see that robotic -- well, I  guess robot going in there to find out whatever that is.    But the police apparently suspect that there might be some type of booby trap,  IED device inside that apartment and they've now asked everybody in the area to  now move back. We're going to continue to watch this live as it unfolds.    Joining us now with reaction, former LAPD detective Mark Fuhrman, former NYPD  detective Bo Dietl, trial attorney, political commentator Eric Guster, former  FBI special agent Manny Gomez.    Mark, let me begin with you. You watched the robotics. You see at the place  where the shooting took place, where the two suspects were killed, Mark, and you  see all of these tactical vehicles that have been brought in. I have checked in  with my law enforcement sources in Los Angeles, FBI -- "All hands on deck," is  what I'm hearing. This seems to be bigger than what we are so far being told,  probably out of an abundance of caution. But what is your read on it?   
MARK FUHRMAN, FORMER LAPD DETECTIVE: Well, we saw the press conference, Sean. FBI says, We're not ruling out terrorism, which is FBI words that they're ruling  in terrorism. And that means that they'd rather be safe than sorry. So it's a  complete alert for all law enforcement agencies adjacent to San Bernardino  County. All assets of special units is being pulled to San Bernardino County and  they're working with multiple teams.    You have investigative teams that are working at that homicide location. You  have people that are assigned to the victims that can talk. They're trying to  glean any information they can. They're showing pictures of the suspects to the  people at the scene, people at the hospital, anybody that can talk. They're  trying to see the connection there. They're trying to see if they can try to  connect up any other suspects, or what we now know as or refer to as a cell,  where some group of people that could have been involved in this that they  haven't accounted for.   
HANNITY: Yes. Manny, let me go and ask you, from the FBI's perspective, when you hear "All hands on deck," when you see what's unfolding right now before our  very eyes, and you hear that little bits of information are being released from  Adam and Jonathan and Catherine, three of our best reporters, about perhaps  Middle Eastern, perhaps a foreign- sounding name, what do you take out of that?   
MANNY GOMEZ, FORMER FBI SPECIAL AGENT: They're being very cautious. They obviously know more than...   
HANNITY: A lot more.  
GOMEZ: ... they telling, a lot more than they're telling. But they're going to be 1,000 percent sure as to the information that they let out. And they're also  going to vet it through their chain of command to see what is going to be the  flavor of the political correctness of what they let out.   
HANNITY: You know, one of the things I noticed, Bo, is, you know, this was so well prepared. They had their tactical device. They had their guns. They had  their weapons. They went in, according to eyewitnesses, they fired straight for  30 seconds, they dropped their clip, they reloaded, they shot again.    They got out. They had an escape vehicle, but yet they stayed in the area. They  knew -- they stayed in the same vehicle that was being reported for a couple of  hours, literally just a couple of miles from where the shooting took place.    So the question I have in my mind is, why would they stay so close? It tells me  when they could have gotten away that they're willing to go down with the cause  .   
BO DIETL, FMR. NYPD DETECTIVE, FOX CONTRIBUTOR: Yes, you know, and the other thing is that it's just very -- it's a mystery there that there was an argument,  and it has been documented...   
HANNITY: At the party.  
DIETL: At the party, where a guy stormed out there. Was there something that was said that heated this guy up, where he ran back and got his friends, one female,  one other guy, and come back and wanted to do exactly what they wanted to do?    Look, it may turn out to be that their Middle East-sounding name -- we don't  know, on fact, if they're a cell or anything like that. That will all be put  together.   
HANNITY: But listen, we don't know the answer. Nobody can say definitively. The FBI is telling us that they're not ruling out terrorism. But after Paris...   
DIETL: You always got to look at the motive. The motive...      
HANNITY: ... were well prepared.  
DIETL: Why did they go to the second floor, going into that room and shoot those people? Why didn't they just blast people on the way up?   
HANNITY: 670 people work in that building. So it seems like...  
DIETL: You could have got a lot more...      
DIETL: You could have got a lot more body count.  
HANNITY: You could have, if they wanted...  
DIETL: And they were fully armed there. So what I'm saying is they went into that room for a specific reason. When we find out what the motive is -- then  again, on the other side, they could have been praying to Allah and that part of  their life. Who knows?   
HANNITY: We don't know.      
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Sean...  
HANNITY: Could be domestic terrorism. All right, let me go to KNBC in Los Angeles...   
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Sean?  
HANNITY: ... actually spoke to a witness, Jose Rocha who actually captured part of the police chase and the gunfire when the two suspects were killed. Watch  this.       
UNIDENTIFIED MALE:. Gunshots,. Those are gunshots!   
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Oh, yes.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Those are gunshots!  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Holy.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Oh! What the?  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Look, gunfire right now. Oh, damn! They got him right there.      
HANNITY: Really, really scary, and it reminds us, by the way, how law enforcement puts their lives on the line every day for us.    What's your take on all of this from your perspective, Eric?   
ERIC GUSTER, TRIAL ATTORNEY: From my perspective, I thought it was a hit or a direct target that -- they went into a specific room, shot specific people, and  without blasting the entire campus of this corporation. Now, if they -- if the  LAPD and the FBI find booby traps, that would totally change my viewpoint of  this.   
HANNITY: Eric, I got to interrupt you here. Apparently, we have some breaking news from Adam Housley, who has information on the suspect's name. Adam, what  can you tell us?   
HOUSLEY: Yes, Sean, a bunch of information. Just got off the phone with some law enforcement sources. They're telling me several things. First of all, they now  believe that this is a two-person crime. They're dialing it back from a third  person. They're not saying that others aren't involved, but they say that with  the interviews that's been taking place and some of the early investigative  processes that they're thinking this may have been a two-person crime, and both  those people would be in that SUV.    I'm told that the SUV back there, while they've gotten closer to it and be able  to get some stuff out of it, it's not completely cleared. It'sYou  see the flashing lights.    Also, we're now being told -- we've been told a name, at least I have, for about  four hours. I know its been circulating at FOX and also other agencies that The  LA Times is now saying that they've got it confirmed. I know I have two law  enforcement sources saying the same thing, but The Times is the one that came  out and said it's Syed Farook and that he's an American citizen is one of the  names, S-Y-E-D or Syed, Farook.    The reason why this has been delicate, I was told by law enforcement when I  asked them about that name, was because I'm told both names are obviously not  your typical American name. Doesn't mean that it was a terrorist attack or  anything like that at all. But because it's a Middle Eastern name and the other  one is also, quote, a "weird" name, in the sense that it's not a common name,  that that's why they're being very delicate here.    Is this workplace violence? Is it terrorism? They want to make sure they get it  right. That's why they have been very delicate with us. Also that name, Syed  Farook or -- Syed Farook, had another name associated with it. As you know, a  lot of times, names that are immigrant names will have two or three other names.  Even in the Hispanic population, you'll have two or three last names, and it  makes things a little bit more difficult sometimes.    And so they were dealing with that also because they had a couple other names  associated with Syed -- S-Y-E-D -- Syed Farook. So that's why that was all  becoming a bit difficult for them to talk to us about, at the same time, for us  really to report, Sean.    The LA Times is now saying they have it confirmed, and I have two law  enforcement sources that said that that's the name that they are going with, as  well. So that again makes this a much more interesting situation. They've  dialled it back to two. They've given us a name -- well, The New York Daily  Timeshas given us a name, I should say. I'll hang it on them, and that  the other individual's name is again, quote, a "weird" name, meaning not normal  -- not a common name...       
HANNITY: Have you heard that name? Is it similar sounding? I mean, it's very difficult to glean anything exactly from a name. But they're saying it's  similar?   
HOUSLEY: Yes, and that's part of the problem, Sean. Some of these names -- it could be Armenian. It could be -- it could be, you know, Arabic. I mean, some of  those names are kind of right there on the fringe, and that's what this name is.    And so I'm not going to say it, obviously, because I'm not even close to having  that confirmed. But the first one, LA Times is confirming it. I know a couple of  the news agencies are confirming. When I mentioned to the law enforcement  sources that I've been speaking to, just hung up with, who told me they've  dialed it back to now two suspects, they believe, they confirmed it, as well.    That doesn't mean that there's not a bigger picture here, Sean. Doesn't mean  there are more suspects out there or other people they worked with. That part  they're taking very, very seriously. I'm still hearing helicopters periodically.  We'll hear sirens.    We know about the situation in Redlands, where our crew's been told to move  back. They're worried about problems there, and they're worried about problems  here down the street. And that will continue, I'm told, for some time because,  again, safety and security is number one for them, but also trying to preserve  as much evidence as they can as this investigation...       
HANNITY: Well, Adam, I can add to this, by the way...  
HOUSLEY: And obviously, a lot of concern here, Sean, a lot of concern. FBI came out here very early on, and they came out here in a large force.   
HANNITY: Adam, I just got this tweet. The Washington Times is tweeting out that Syed Farook, San Bernardino shooting suspect, identified apparently by his  father, as reported by The Washington Times, as a devoutly religious Muslim. So  that now raises once again the possibility that this was...   
HOUSLEY: And it raises it again.  
HANNITY: ... a terror attack in the world that we're living in today.  
HOUSLEY: And Sean, we've been told he worked nearby, and maybe at a medical industry, some sort of technician or something. I didn't get the exact detail on  that because I wanted to get to you.    I do know that CAIR, obviously controversial Council on Islamic Relations, is  having a press conference in Anaheim about an hour from here with, they say, a  member of one of the suspect's family is going to be there. So that's going to  be interesting to see how that's painted or played out.    But obviously, this is evolving very quickly this evening, Sean, a lot of  concern, as you might imagine, amongst law enforcement about, are these two  folks that just acted alone? Are they people that were connected to other  people? Was it terrorism? Was it workplace violence? Obviously, this was  planned. I mean, they guaranteed that from the beginning...       
HANNITY: Adam, you know, one of the things I didn't quite understand how somebody -- if it was the workplace violence situation, and the police have left  that open as a possibility. We heard the FBI director. We heard others  tonight...   
HOUSLEY: They have to, though.  
HANNITY: They have to. Of course. And they didn't rule out terrorism and they were very clear that there were certain things that indicated possibly it could  be. But what never made sense to me is the idea that somebody would leave a  party angry, go home, get somebody else, get dressed up in tactical gear and  have all those weapons all ready to go -- I wasn't sure if I believed that from  the beginning.   
HOUSLEY: And that's what they're -- and that's one of the loose ends they have, Sean. I mean, it wasn't do cut and dried. I mean, if this guy had a problem  there, and all of a sudden started shooting, it would make it a lot easier to  say workplace violence.    But you know, part of the problem, as well, is you have the situation of the  names, where they had a couple of different last names associated, or at least  they thought might be associated. You know, there was reports there were three  suspects. I mean, there were a lot of things they had. And of course, the number  one priority is to secure -- ensure security and safety.    And before the shootout happened, I mean, within 20 minutes of the shootout  happening here, before I was tipped off on my phone that there was a chase and  we bolted out here in our car, I was told by law enforcement that, You know  what? We're going on a theory we have three people, fully armored with, you  know, semiautomatic rifles, and looking to kill. And they had to go on that  premise.    Now it looks like there were two people obviously looking to kill because you  saw the video on your show.   
HANNITY: Yes.  
HOUSLEY: Right there, Sean, I mean, 150 yards away as an unmarked car leaves. That's where the back window was shot out. Was it shot out by the police  officers or was it shot out by the individuals inside? We don't know, but it was  shot out. And then 100 yards past that, the first real barrage of gunfire. Then  about 150 yards past that is where it ended. And that's where those lights are  right now. And that's why they're still trying to deal with the SUV, and they  think there's a possible device still inside. They haven't been able to truly  get all the way inside...   
HANNITY: The one thing I think we can...      
HOUSLEY: ... evidence out. So you know, there's a lot of things going on here, and safety and security being one, Sean, and then, of course, trying to figure  out the connections, if there any, to terrorism is number two.   
HANNITY: Adam, the one thing that we can determine is when my FBI source out in Los Angeles, which is the second largest bureau in the country, second to New  York, confirmed to me that it's all hands on deck. And it's all hands on deck  for all law enforcement.   
HOUSLEY: Yes.  
HANNITY: And the way, hours later, they're still treating that vehicle, and the robotic device going into the home of one of the suspects that were killed, and  the slow release of the name and identity and ethnicity of the background -- I  don't think there's any doubt from an outsider's perspective that the FBI is  taking what they said very seriously, that this is a potential terrorist attack.   
HOUSLEY: Absolutely. You know, I got an individual in the law enforcement community in D.C. that has a lot of stuff on the counterterrorism side of things  and messaged me just now that the last name, if -- you know, that's being  reported by The LA Times, and by the father's being true, and I was told by law  enforcement, has an either Egyptian or eastern Libyan normally denomination.  That's where you generally find that last name.    As you know, it's tribal, so they're very easy to connect names or easier to  connect names in other parts of the world in some respects. And that's obviously  where that might go.    But we don't know, Sean. There's so much still to do here. The number one thing  again is security and safety. Then it's to see -- you know, and that includes  are there other people involved here? Did someone help them get the weapons? Are  there other people that were planning on doing?Is there a situation where  there's other people waiting? That's the situation that they have to ensure  first as they try to clear this scene and the one in Redlands.    And then, you know, as part of that, of course, they look at the terrorism  angle. But you know, safety and security is going to be number one always. And  you know that. And the FBI did come out here with a massive contingent.    As we were driving out, Sean, I mean, we -- we left the office within minutes,  and we were -- you know, surprisingly, there was no traffic in LA. That never  happens. And we're on our way out here on the 10 freeway, and we were, you know,  doing a pretty good clip, and here comes the FBI guys. I know their vehicles.  They come flying by me on the shoulder, on the inside, and they were -- you  know, they were moving. And...   
HANNITY: Hey, Adam...      
HOUSLEY: ... Whoa, this is...  
HANNITY: I've got a little bit more...  
HOUSLEY: That's a quick response by a large team.  
HANNITY: I just told you what The Washington Times reported, that he was devoutly religious, according to his father. Now The New York Daily News is  reporting that the father, whom they didn't name, confirmed in an interview that  his son inspected restaurants, hotels for health violations, and was married  with a child.    Now, from what I understand, at the Christmas party that was at the center, that  now that maybe gives you more indication that it could be some type of workplace  violence event.   
DIETL: Well, I think it's...  
HANNITY: Hang on, Adam. Stay right there.  
HOUSLEY: And that's why...  
DIETL: Sean, I think it's very important that we look at one thing. First, they lived right nearby. Second, was what jumps out? Everyone said they had masks.  Why would they have masks? So they can't be identified. That means people in  that building knew who they were, and they had to put masks so they wouldn't be  identified.   
HANNITY: Well, bank robbers would do it, too...  
DIETL: My feelings are because his name is Egyptian, that's an Egyptian last name, he could be a support of a Muslim --   
HANNITY: Let me go back to the "New York Daily News." The father also identified his son, Farook, as very, very religious. "He would go to work, come back, go to  pray, come back, he's Muslim." That's a quote, direct quote.   
ERIC GUSTER, ATTORNEY: That doesn't indicate it's terrorism, though. And we can't make that --   
HANNITY: I'm not saying that.  
GUSTER: When we look at domestic terrorism like Columbine --  
HANNITY: Hang on. Adam? Jump in, Adam, go ahead.  
ADAM HOUSLEY, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Sorry, and that's a good point. And that's what I think needs to be stressed here. We've got some people who have  criticized, or at least I've got a couple of messages on my phone saying how  come you're not coming out and calling it terrorism. That's exactly what we're  all discussing right here. There's a lot of variables here and there's a lot of  sensitivities here. And really right now for law enforcement, they could care  less about that. What they care about is ensuring that they get these people and  that situation cleared behind it and that there's no other immediate threats.  That's the number one priority right now.   
HANNITY: I totally agree. We don't know. And we'll know more, but certainly the FBI, and law enforcement, as a whole, are treating this as the worst possible  scenario that this could be an act of terror, and all hands on deck is an  indication of that.    I do have some numbers to share with our audience, Adam, if you stay right  there. When this whole Syrian refugee debate came up, remember, we learned there  were 1,000 ongoing probes of ISIS within America. We have a new study that  actually came out today. George Washington University shows U.S. authorities  have made 71 ISIS-related arrests since march of 2014, 56 of them, this year.  And 71 people have been arrested nationwide for the alleged connections to is,  13 people arrested in New York alone, 11 people in Minnesota alone. And all told  Americans now, according to the study, report, George Washington University, 250  Americans that tried to travel successfully to reach Syria or Iraq to join ISIS.    So when you add the thousand with the 250 in the country, you know, we should  not be surprised. This of course should be top of mind for law enforcement.  We're not making judgments, but it would be prudent and frankly, it would be  dereliction of duty not to, right?   
MANNY GOMEZ, FORMER FBI SPECIAL AGENT: Agreed. And in fact the director of the FBI, Comey, has said he reported to Congress that the FBI and local law  enforcement cannot cover all of these potential suspects. They have thousands of  people there.   
HANNITY: That's scary, right?  
GOMEZ: It is scary. When you have the top badge in the United States basically telling Congress and the U.S., we can't cover them all. We don't have the  resources. So could this be somebody that fell through the cracks? Sure. But I  think the fact that we're even here discussing this situation on the heels of  what happened in Paris is very interesting indeed. And 20 years ago this would  have been just horrific murder and we wouldn't have this panel here. Today, on  the heels of Paris and other attacks, and let's face it, this is an epidemic  here in the U.S. --   
HANNITY: Let me go back to the FBI spokesman. He said we will go where the evidence takes us as it relates to terror. He was very, very clear about that.  And he mentioned a few potential things were out there that are making them stay  on that course as well as the workplace violence course.   
GUSTER: Right. But workplace violence is what makes sense in this one, Sean.  
HANNITY: I actually disagree with you.  
GUSTER: A lot of people say, oh, they went home, it doesn't take long to go home, get your guns, then come back.   
HANNITY: But wait a minute, Eric, you're saying they went home, that they had incident at the party. They went home. They put on tactical gear that was all  prepared and all laid out, that apparently might have been even booby-trapped  their house, and they might have had some type of explosive devices, hang on,  then they had loaded, long rifles, probably an AR, loaded pistols, then they  went back, and then they left, and then they still stayed in the neighborhood?   
GUSTER: If the house is booby-trapped, absolutely not.  
HANNITY: That might be a problem for your theory.  
GUSTER: That would be. But as far as going home, getting your guns, putting your clothes and coming back, that doesn't take time, because just like with me  coming to FOX News when there's breaking news, I can get from Brooklyn, I can be  working out, put on my suit, get here from Brooklyn --   
HANNITY: You're superman. Let me go back to Mark Fuhrman. Mark, with all this new information since I last spoke to you, and now the name that has been  released in this particular case, what do you make of the investigation in the  police resources going into this?   
MARK FUHRMAN, FOX NEWS CONTRIBUTOR: Well, Sean, you know, I've been listening, quite intently on really an effort to be more delicate with a known suspect that  shot it out with the police and killed 14 people than we are the 14 people that  are dead. I think being delicate about possible terrorism in this country and  possible terrorists and people that don't belong here is exactly how we got  here. And whether this is terrorism or not, and whether they went to the party  and came back home and got all dressed up and then came back is almost  irrelevant. We know the two people that did. We know that they went there. We  know one is a Middle Eastern, of Middle Eastern descent, highly devout.    Whether he came back there or somebody else did just to make sure that certain  people were there, they targeted the location. It's an act of terrorism if they  never find a scrap of paper or computer entry or any kind of radicalization.  It's terrorism. It's terrorizing a community for no reason whatsoever. It's  terrorism.   
HANNITY: Well said. All right, we have new information. We go back to Adam Housley on the ground for us tonight. Adam, what's the new information?   
HOUSLEY: Yes, Sean, I want to touch on what you said a second ago. I'm glad you mentioned this, one of the problems law enforcement was having with the whole  making this workplace violence, and it still could be, is the situation that  they had the tactical gear. And that's what really throws a curve ball for them.    Off of that, one of our producers recently heard an interview with the neighbor,  a neighbor over there in Redlands who said that she was alarmed because the new  people that moved in next door had been receiving packages and a lot of package  deliveries and working late in the night in the garage. So it had her a bit  alarmed because that is not something that would normally take place there. So  obviously that is playing into this.    We also can't forget one more thing, Sean. There's 14 people that lost their  lives tonight. And as we look at the terrorism angle on this, the potential of  that happening, we have those families who've lost 14 loved ones, and also the  update from the hospital I just got that the medical center, Loma Linda  hospital, obviously very well-known for what they do in the medical field, five  total are there. Two are critical. So, as you know, tonight, as this  investigation goes forward and law enforcement trying to ensure the safety and  security of this community, there are families that have lost loved ones and  many others that are fighting for their life right now, Sean.   
HANNITY: We can't forget them.   You know, I want to go back, go back to what the neighbor was saying. And, yes,  families are in thoughts and prayers, and it's unimaginable that believe 14  people died and their families are mourning tonight and 17 other people and  their families are praying for their safety and their survival. But let's go  back to the neighbor of Syed Farook and what they saw late at night and the  packages being delivered, and that made them suspicious. Would it go late into  the night? Were there multiple people in that garage? You know, some people  might go into the garage and tinker on their cars, but, maybe now knowing what  we know happened, you have to suspect maybe something was going on.   
HOUSLEY: Yes. And I'll give you the exact quote what was said, it was being said to a radio reporter, a local radio reporter, 1070, which is a radio station here  Los Angeles, respected --   
HANNITY: KMX.  
HOUSLEY: The quote was this, this is from the neighbor now -- yes, KX. This is the quote, it said, "Three to four Middle Easterners had recently moved into the  apartment of interest," which is the one next door in Redlands in the past  couple of weeks. She was alarmed because they were getting a lot of package  deliveries and working late in the night in the garage. That came from the  neighbor next door.    Again, lends you to believe that there's something suspicious going on here. And  that's the one problem law enforcement's had from the beginning on this, Sean,  is you know, workplace violent, you don't generally see someone go back home,  get somebody else, mount up, so to speak, and put on tactical gear like that and  come back with that kind of weaponry. That just doesn't what usually happens,  I'm told by law enforcement, when you have workplace violence situations.   
HANNITY: Yes. It doesn't make any sense.  
HOUSLEY: It's a very delicate situation to put it lightly. It's one of several reasons why.   
HANNITY: You're talking about three to four Middle Eastern men in a place in the garage late at night, they had just moved in, suspicions of the neighbor. Again,  this is an unfolding story. We can't jump to conclusions, but it certainly is  getting -- we're beginning to put the pieces of the puzzle together. Now, stay  right there, Adam, great reporting tonight. We'll get back to you in a second.    We just got unbelievable tape into FOX News. It's an interview on KTTV outside  of the suspect's home, in Redlands, California. It was interrupted by a large  bang. Listen to this.       
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: They're talking like it's possible terrorists attacks and stuff. It's crazy. Oh, my gosh.   
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Oh, my god.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: And now there's booms?      
HANNITY: All right, joining us now with the latest information about the suspect's home that is being searched, you see the robotic device going into  that home, is our own Jonathan Hunt. Jonathan, were you there? Did you hear that  boom?   
JONATHAN HUNT, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Our producer Dan Gallo was on the scene, there, Sean. He heard that boom. It sounded to him like the controlled explosion  of something, something suspicious being carried out by law enforcement  personnel on the scene. He also was the one who shot that video of the robotic  machine heading towards the front door of that property.    Just going back to your discussion, Sean, on the theories that have been put  forward by the FBI, that terrorism may be one of them, workplace violence may be  another. Those two are not necessarily mutually exclusive. Let me put this to  you. You possibly have somebody who has planned to carry out some kind of terror  attack. That person is then at a gathering apparently with his colleagues,  because we now know this one person named was an environmental health inspector.  Health workers were holding this party where the shooting took place today. Say  that person feels that he is slighted at that gathering. Then he leaves. Then he  goes and gets his accomplice and he says, never mind what we were planning,  let's do this now.    So those two theories are not necessarily mutually exclusive. That is not to say  that is what happened. We do not know the details yet. We will be told them. We  will find them out via officials eventually. But those two theories, not  mutually exclusive, Sean.   
HANNITY: I certainly can see and understand anything is a possibility at this point. But the idea that somebody got angry, just happened to run home, get  another person, get their tactical gear, load their weapons and come back that  quickly is, to me is a little bit of a stretch.   
HUNT: Sean, the point being, Sean, that that person could be thinking that, could have --   
HANNITY: It's 100 percent they were ready for an attack.  
HUNT: All of that gear is ready to go.  
HANNITY: Bo Dietl agrees with you too.  
DIETL: I like that theory very much.  
HANNITY: Let me ask this question. What do you know about the robotic device going in? Now usually that is done in cases where the police believe, maybe they  were looking into the apartment building, but where they believe that there  might be some type of explosive device or some type of IED or some type of booby  trap. Do you believe that that was an actual trap that was set off, something  that was left behind to injure and hurt or kill police?   
HUNT: Officials have not told us that at this the point, Sean. It is quite possible that that was the case. But, clearly, they are on a very high alert  here. Clearly, they know that these two attackers who shot, that already shot  dead 14 people were heavily armed. Clearly, they were suspicious that they might  have some sort of booby trap in that property and in the vehicle where they had  that, remember, that intense shootout with the two suspects earlier. So the  police and other law enforcement who are on the scene there are obviously moving  with the utmost caution. And if they see any kind of package, any kind of item  that they are suspicious about, they're going to send in the robotic machinery  first. They're not going to take any risks with their own personnel, Sean.   
HANNITY: All right, Jonathan, thank you, and stay there. We are getting some new information that the group CAIR, the Council on Islamic Relations, you might  remember, they were unindicted co-conspiracies in that big Texas case. Anyway,  they will hold a press conference in about 45 minutes. It's expected that they  will have one of the family members, I assume of Syed Farook, considering that's  the only name made public at this time, which is also the father has been quoted  in the "New York Daily News" and the "Washington Times" as of tonight.    Let me turn to you, Bo Dietl. As you get all of this new information and you  hear what Jonathan is saying and you hear the package and that boom, what do you  think?   
DIETL: I like his theory. They were possibly terrorists in the planning. Something came down --   
HANNITY: Set him off.  
DIETL: Something was said to him, "you towelhead," excuse my expression, something was said in the respect, it was negative. And he ran home, got his  accomplice and came back. He could have said something negative --   
HANNITY: You're saying some type of epithet was used, racial epithet, and out of anger that would have set off what was in the planning already.   
DIETL: Exactly, in the planning already. That could sound very possible.  
HANNITY: It's speculation. We really don't know. But I do see as this is unfolding more and more, it's certainly apparent to me, and you know the FBI  tactics, it certainly appears that they are treating this as a terror attack.   
GOMEZ: Agreed. It seems to me that if they knew that it wasn't, they would have already put that out and quelled everybody's concerns.   
HANNITY: Are they too cautious though? They knew the name for a long time. They didn't release it. Are they too cautious? I heard this name hours ago tonight.  Are they too cautious, they won't give any description of those that are  deceased?   
GOMEZ: They are being cautious.  
HANNITY: What is the caution about, being PC?  
GOMEZ: Right, totally.  
HANNITY: So the FBI is PC?  
GOMEZ: The FBI answers to a higher calling, and the truth of the matter is, this could be a politically charged incident if it turns out to be an ISIS cell. And  they want to be absolutely sure --   
HANNITY: But the FBI has been very clear. I have to give credit to these guys. They have pointed out there's 1,000 probes ongoing right now in the United  States. That's why I have been so outspoken and passionate, if we know that a  certain percentage of Syrian refugees have ISIS sympathies and the national  director of intelligence, James Clapper, and James Comey, who everybody  respects, the FBI director and our assistant FBI director and the general in  charge of tactics that take out ISIS are all saying that ISIS will infiltrate  the Syrian refugee community, why would we risk the lives of Americans? Why  would we take a chance like that?   
GOMEZ: On top of that, I believe that even beyond that, even if they don't infiltrate, even if we're that good at being able to discern which is an ISIS  sympathizer and which isn't, we're basically importing the next wave of  potential sympathizers. They will be radicalized, statistically, a percentage of  them --   
HANNITY: If that robot set off a bomb, all bets are off.  
GOMEZ: That's 100 percent.  
DIETL: We agree. The thing we're talking about, 10,000 FBI agents. When I was on the police department many years ago, they used to deputize a lot New York City  cops and cops of Nassau County as U.S. marshals to support the FBI. They have  hundreds of thousands, well, 100,000 cops across this country that can be  deputized and work with the FBI and have their surveillance teams. They should  be utilizing all the police departments and start to get candidates in there to  be sworn in as U.S. marshals along with the FBI to support the FBI.   
HANNITY: From the earliest moments, let me go back to Mark Fuhrman, my law enforcement resources and my friends out in Los Angeles, they were telling me  from the get-go that all hand were on deck. They were telling me from the  get-go, everybody was on board. The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms, the  FBI, every law enforcement agent, everybody with a badge and a gun was called  into this situation, Mark.   
FUHRMAN: Well, what they did is they established a tactical alert probably in four or five of the southern California counties. And that means that everybody  comes to work. The lower levels have to maintain the patrol and the security of  the city, and all the upper echelon detectives and special tactical units end up  going to San Bernardino or other locations where they've indicated there might  be a threat.    And, you know, I'd like to try to understand why we have to be so sensitive with  known suspects, known names, known shootouts, known murderers. And this is the  problem. When you make political correctness ahead of justice, you're not going  to get justice.   
HANNITY: Yes.  
FUHRMAN: It's just not going to happen.  
HANNITY: And listen, the name, I first heard the name Syed Farook hours ago today. I heard it during my radio show which didn't end until four and a half  hours ago, that name was passed on to me. So they knew more, and it does raise a  very important question, why are they so slow and giving the public the  information and I guess they don't want people to rush to judgment in this case.    The group CAIR, which, by the way, is going to hold a press conference, release  a presser and say later tonight the greater Los Angeles office of the Council on  American Islamic Relations of Southern California will hold a press conference  with leaders of the Muslim community to condemn today's deadly shooting spree in  San Bernardino and to offer condolences to loved ones, which I can understand. I  don't think people blame all Muslims. I think there are people that blame  radical Islamists. And this is the distinction, and this president can't even  utter those words, Eric, not to get too political.   
GUSTER: Some people cannot distinguish the difference. Some people -- but some people just assume all Muslims are bad. That's why we have to be careful with  trying to put names out there and trying to lump all of them together.   
HANNITY: Four or five hours to put out a name?   We'll take a break. We'll come back, and when we come back we'll have the latest  information out of San Bernardino. Not only are we awaiting the CAIR press  conference, we're also awaiting another press conference. HANNITY will go until  midnight tonight here on the FOX News Channel. We'll have full coverage of all  the events that are happening in San Bernardino and the investigation into who  was responsible for the killing of 14, injuring of 17 earlier today.   
HANNITY: Welcome back to FOX News. This is a FOX News alert. And of course our continuing coverage, 14 people killed, 17 injured earlier today. We go back to  Catherine Herridge. She has some new information for us. Catherine, what's new?   
CATHERINE HERRIDGE, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Thank you, Sean.   A law enforcement source here in Washington D.C. is telling us that this name  Syed Farook is in play. They're describing it to us as a strong lead and a  possible suspect in the shooting. They're also saying that at this time based on  the evidence they do not believe that the female and male suspect who are have  been identified.    Now, earlier today we were given a longer version or what I would describe as a  variation of this name Syed Farook, and we were told at that time it had washed  out. A U.S. government official says it had been run against the databases and  they had no positive hits. But now it says it may well be one of the suspects in  this case, Sean.   
HANNITY: I'm trying to understand exactly what you said there, because I thought you said they were not identified, but yet the name was released.   
HERRIDGE: What they're saying to me is that the bodies have not been identified. They're saying that this name, Syed Farook is separate from those individuals.  That's how it's explained to me.   
HANNITY: OK, understood. And we don't know the name of the female that was killed in the shootout?   
HERRIDGE: No. I don't have that.  
HANNITY: OK, but we were told earlier, I think it was by Adam Housley, I believe, that in fact that too, was not a regular-sounding name? Maybe I guess,  not John Smith.   
HERRIDGE: I don't have any sort of visibility on the names of the two dead suspects. What I do know is that Syed Farook is the name that's in play. It's  described as a strong lead and a possible suspect in the shooting, someone who  was involved. And then I was told the two dead suspects have not been identified  by name. So if you put that together it would not seem that name linked to those  suspects.   
HANNITY: All right, appreciate it. Thank you, Catherine Herridge. Mark Fuhrman, I understand during the break, you feel not releasing the name earlier when in  fact they knew the name was a big mistake because valuable time was lost?   
FUHRMAN: Well, valuable time was lost. One you put the name out, you have everybody listening. If this person was actually in our society and working and  living and going to school or whatever he was doing, then people would know him,  and then you could place him. You can find out his associates, where he was  going, and this investigation might have turned at least quicker in what they  found out and quite possibly might have got those two suspects before they  actually took off and ended up in a shootout with police.   
HANNITY: In other words, they could have gotten more information from the public. We were told during the press conference that in fact a tip did lead to  the discovery of these two people, Mark.   
FUHRMAN: You know, I'm listening to Catherine Harris --  
HANNITY: Herridge.  
FUHRMAN: And two people in the car are deceased and haven't been identified, and yet we have a named suspect. Is that the named suspect that was actually in the  conference that left the conference and these two people in the car? Or are the  people that actually went in and did the shooting? Do we have another suspect  that's loose? Do we have four people or is the suspect loose the named suspect?  I'm a little confused.   
HANNITY: We did hear from Adam Housley and Jonathan earlier that they believe this was a two-suspect crime. Now, they additionally, when they talk about a  third person that was caught running away and that has been detained, but we  have not been told officially, although we expect a press conference coming up  momentarily, we do expect that we will get more information when in fact that  happens, Bo.   
DIETL: You know, we got some information there about the guy supposedly working with the health department or something. The father said that he's married, he's  a devout Muslim and all that. Now, that would stand to reason if that's him, the  cops have him identified now. Through fingerprints he's got to be identified by  now. Now with the father saying that that is his son, is there a possibility  this in fact is his wife, the female? Where is the wife? He's supposedly  married.   
HANNITY: Then, we go back too, Eric, according to Adam Housley, remember the reports and Jonathan Hunt earlier talking about the one neighbor that was  worried about all of the packages being delivered to the house where we see that  robot going in live, and we have had heard the explosion, that late night  activity in the garage. Remember, these were two new people moving into the  neighborhood, lots of packages, lots of late night activity in the garage that  made the neighbors suspicious.   
GUSTER: When you see something, say something. If they in fact were doing something sinister, but you have to remember, when people are moving in, they're  going to get packages. When I moved first moved into Brooklyn, I was getting  packages every other day with furniture.   
DIETL: Sure everybody gets assault rifles.  
GUSTER: Nobody said there were assault rifles. You can't make that assumption, Bo. You've got to be careful not to make that assumption.   
DIETL: They shot 14 people.  
GUSTER: The FBI not giving out information, they already had the mans' name. They already knew where he lived.   
HANNITY: Hang on. I think what Mark is saying is a very valid point. In other words if in fact it was a public tip that led to the discovery of these two  people, I think he makes a point if they knew the name earlier they could have  gotten more public assistance. But as we've been talking about all night  tonight, there is a level of political correctness, a fear, they don't want to  jump the gun. We in the news media, we don't want to make a mistakes either and  jump the gun. So it's a fine line, a razor's edge.   
GUSTER: Sometimes the FBI and police department don't want to release all of the information because they may alert someone else that they knew who these people  are, they may be searching and on their trail. They have to be careful with what  they release, especially if they already know who it is.   
HANNITY: Yes. Well, we're going to watch it continue and monitor, and we'll have the very latest on the San Bernardino shooting and of course the investigation  and all the latest details as the next hour of HANNITY starts right here, right  now.   
HANNITY: And this is a Fox News Alert. And we are waiting a press conference from law enforcement about the latest developments into the investigation into  the deadly San Bernardino shooting that killed 14 and injured 17. The L.A.  Times, the A.P. have identified one of the suspects as Syed Farook and the FBI  will not rule out terrorism as a possible motive.    Our own Adam Housley is on the ground live in California tonight as he's been  all night with the very latest. Adam?   
ADAM HOUSLEY, FOX NEWS SENIOR CORRESPONDENT: Sean, here is why this has been so difficult for law enforcement. I want to give you an account of what I was given  about maybe five minutes ago or so that it was given to me from someone very  close to this case saying that, "I don't think they went to a gathering, got  into the fight, went home afterwards and dressed in tactical clothing, grabbed a  pipe bomb, grabbed AR-15, and then headed back for revenge. That's just too much  for us to believe right now. It simply has to be -- there has to be a lot of  planning involved. Several people agreeing on conducting this type of attack,  plain and simple, this does not seem spontaneous."    So, that's clearly obvious to those of us not in law enforcement so that's one  reason why law enforcement has this difficult situation and why they are looking  and will not rule out the possibility of terrorism. And that is why they were  also being very delicate with names.    Now, I know Catherine has reported that the name -- they're working with the  name Syed Farook. I can tell you one reason why they were holding that name back  is because there have been a couple of other names associated. We know that  people of Middle Eastern descent sometimes will have two or three names  associated with their name more or so than you'll find maybe a common name  that's been Americanized for some time.    I do want to show you this behind me as well, Sean. In the last 5 to 10 minutes  or so, the two scientific teams came out. If you look down to this you'll see a  draw back now, which leads me to believe -- I know they've gotten in the part of  the SUV, leads me to believe that they're in the SUV. I have not got that  confirmed from anybody there but the fact that the scientific teams came out,  investigative teams, and that you're seeing a much less. You don't see the  police presence that we'd seen even as long as 5 to 10 minutes ago, or I should  say as recent as 5 to 10 minutes ago. And the battle to the battering ram  anymore as well. It looks like that they have gotten into that vehicle and  gotten at least the information they were looking for.    As I said before, earlier in some of our reports, they had seen some stuff  inside. They felt would help with the investigation, what that is, a purse, is  it a wallet? I mean you don't know obviously because they're not going to tell  you that. But they did say there were some stuff in there and they weren't  willing to go in and try and get it because they felt there might be a device  inside.    We have not heard any sort of device or explosion here. You can see the grainy  video down there that there are still investigative teams on site of course. We,  unlike our producer who is out in the Redlands location, we haven't heard any  sort of detonation of any type. Interestingly, that video that shows the  detonation out in Redlands had it explained to me, they're telling me it wasn't  a, what did they call, Lance?   
LANCE: Disruptor.  
HOUSELY: A disruptor, it's a disruptor. So basically what it's meant to do is it shoots out a water projectile at the end of a shotgun. That's what you see there  on that robot and that's meant to disrupt the possible device. So...   
HANNITY: Adam,would that make that kind of boom noise, what they describing?   
HOUSELY: Potentially yes. He told me if there was a detonation it would take out the front of the house.   
HANNITY: All right, hang on Bo Dietl...  
HOUSELY: Yes.  
BO DIETL, FORMER NYPD DETECTIVE: Yes. It's a trip charge that shoots out in this way if there was something there that would explode.   
HANNITY: All right. So in other words it might not have been a device.  
DIETL: Yes. And...  
HANNITY: All right, but hang on. Let Adam finish his report. We'll going to get to you in a second.   
DIETL: Yes.  
HOUSELY: That's exactly right. Well, and that's what he was trying to make sure that we understood that if it was going to be a detonation that it would take  out a significant part of that location, the front of it at least.    So, had there been other devices found there, we don't know for sure. Obviously,  our producer heard a boom there. But Sean, again, this stuff is fluid. It's  changing as we know, the names, as we talked about.    The comment that I got from someone very close to this case about, you know, you  just don't do go back and do a spontaneous attack with this type of preparation  grabbing weapons like that and grabbing a pipe bomb and grabbing, you know,  tactical gear like that. So, that's why they're not willing to rule out  terrorism but of course they have to be delicate with other possibilities here.    I mean there's always the chance this could be something else. However, remote  that might be. And as yo mentioned Sean, we in the news media can only report  what we know and it's what we're doing now.    I will tell you that again, they still tell me their number one priority is to  secure this area and ensure there's no other threats. And as we know, there is a  chance there could be other people connected to this especially with the  neighbor reported on the radio saying she saw three or four people that moved  into that house in Redlands. So right now we know of two.   
HANNITY: Yeah.  
HOUSELY: In fact, law enforcement says they don't believe there were three people now at that shooting earlier today that killed 14 people. They believe  there were two and that those two people are dead down the street, Sean.   
HANNITY: Yeah. Are you getting report as I am? As I mentioned earlier, the name Syed Farook I'd gotten very early in the day and we weren't able to report it  until this hour. Are you getting names on the woman that was shot, the suspect  shot and that that shootout with police? Because I am.   
HOUSELY: Yeah, yeah. I am too like Syed Farook name. The problem that we had with that name also, Sean, is obviously we want to make sure you get it right.  You don't want to put a wrong name out there. But also there were some other  names associated with it. You know, some other names that might have been  aliases or, you know, other names from -- other tribal names potentially.    So the problem they were having, one reason why they didn't want to really go  with it yet is they wanted to get into that vehicle. They wanted to make sure  that they had wallet, purse, registration, whatever might be in there. They  wanted to really see what was in there to get as much information to ensure they  got the names right. They had, you know, I told you that one investigator seeing  pictures, cellphone pictures taken from the suspects on the weather, on the way  out here so they already knew what they were going to--   
HANNITY: Adam, let me go back to one of the other party, you know.  
HOUSELY: Yeah.  
HANNITY: In one sense these people were very, very well-prepared. If they wanted to make their escape, they would have been able to make the mistake. A couple of  things they would have done is they would have gotten out of the black SUV, the  Yukon and they would have gotten in another vehicle, and they would have gotten  out of town. They could have been to Vegas by now. And yet, they also stayed  together. So it tells me that they had something else in mind, something else  planned. As law enforcement, are they thinking the same way on that?   
HOUSELY: Yes and no. Here is why -- and why I say yes and no is this. You have two things here. You have a situation where they're like, "Holy smokes, we've  done this", and they panicked and hunkered down some place. Or, do they plan on  trying to take out more law enforcement with them?    I mean, you know, if it is a terrorism situation, Sean, if, I want to make sure  that's a big if there, you know, did they want to go down the hail of gun fire  taking law -- more people law enforcement with them. I mean, it's a martyr type  situation. You know, do they really think they were going to get away? I mean  they had to know that they're going to be very quickly, law, that's what the FBI  presence here so quickly as well, that very quickly law enforcement was going to  have an idea who they were.   
HANNITY: All right, yeah.  
HOUSELY: And even though you can jump on a freeway here where we're located and be on the 10 freeway, and be some place three or four hours away, you're still  not going to truly be able to hide out. And I think that especially if he names  are Middle Eastern names especially if they do have a distinct look, and  especially if they didn't have another vehicle in place.    I mean if they're planning on -- if this is terror, if it is, and they're  planning on being martyrs, you know, they don't need a second vehicle.   
HANNITY: Yeah. But they did escape, and they did stay in the area, and they did stay together, and they didn't change vehicles even though they were so  well-prepared in other areas of the attack. One last question, if you can just  confirm because there were so many reports about potential IEDs, pipe bombs that  might have been thrown out of the window, can you confirm or deny that those  reports because the latest was they might not have been pipe bombs or not.   
HOUSELY: I was told by the law enforcement, again, and you got to remember also these crime scenes even though they're close, they still met different crime  scenes. You got the shootout here which is a pretty large crime scene. You got  the search that went on earlier, it looks like there might be someone that  wasn't involved. You have the murder location which is a mile and a half from  here. You have the Redlands location which is five miles past here. So you've  got a, you know, you have you a lot of law enforcement. You have a lot of  investigation going on.    So you have investigators in different areas that are talking as much as they  can, also from different agencies.    So what I've been told is that there was at least one pipe bomb. That's what the  theory is, always have the reportas of right now, was that here was it  thrown out a window, was it found in the Redlands location, was it in that SUV?  I don't know. And it may not be the case. But I'm told as of ten minutes ago  when I got that text that that is what they believe, that there was one pipe  bomb grabbed along with AR rifles and the tactical gear.   
HANNITY: All right, Adam Housley, thanks for staying with us up so late tonight. And when we comeback, we'll have more live coverage of the investigation of the  deadly San Bernardino shooting.    Now, we are awaiting a press conference from law enforcement. They'll have the  very latest. We'll continue, Mark Furman, Eric Guster, Bo Dietl and much, much  more, straight ahead.   
HANNITY: And this is Fox News Alert. And we are awaiting a press conference from law enforcement on their investigation of the California shooting that has  killed 14, injured 17 earlier today in San Bernardino. The L.A. times, the A.P.  have identified one of the shooting suspects as Syed Farook. The FBI said  terrorism is a possibility in today's attack.    Live in the ground in California at the Redlands apartment location is our own  Jonathan Hunt. This is where we heard that boom earlier. We're expecting the  press conference coming up as well.    Jonathan, we are told that it could have been a trip charge not necessarily some  type of IED or booby trap.   
JONATHAN HUNT, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Yeah. We have no indication that it was any kind of booby trap. But so far what we saw happening in our producer on the  ground there shot video I'm showing, which I believe you have there, was a  tactical robot as its called moving towards the front of that property.    Now, that tactical robot gives law enforcement a remote view from a distance. If  they see something then that concerns them, they can fire a water shot at it.  That could produce the kind of boom or detonation that Dan Gallo and others on  the scene heard. They could also, of course, being firing a small device to  break down the door, to open any locks on that door before they make entry  themselves. So they're moving with extreme caution and that is obviously  understandable when you are dealing with suspects who have already shot 14  people dead here in San Bernardino.    Suspects who then engaged in an extremely fierce gun battle with law enforcement  officers as they tried to flee in that SUV.    Now, two suspects as we now know, a man and a woman were shot dead by police  officers in that SUV. There was a third person detained. We do not believe at  this point that there is any evidence linking him directly to the shootings but  obviously the focus now on that property in Redlands where a neighbor said 3 to  4 Middle Eastern men had moved in. And that neighbor was concerned that there  were a lot of packages being delivered to that property and the people in that  property were working late in the garage.    None of that necessarily means anything but clearly it concerned that neighbor.  And clearly, if those concerns are concrete in any way shape or form. It is  understandable that law enforcement now are taking every single precaution  before they move into that property itself to gather any evidence they possibly  can, Sean.   
HANNITY: All right Jonathan, thank you so much.   And we bring back our panel former LAPD Detective Mark Furhman, former NYPD  Detective Bo Dietl and Trial Attorney, Political Commentator Eric Guster.    Let's stay on this point. If the neighbor, Bo, see suspicious behavior and as  Jonathan just reported three to four Middle Eastern men, two people were shot  here, one was a woman. Don't you think FBI and Law enforcement is going to want  to know who the other three men are?   
DIETL: Well let me tell you and mark, when you got a case of this magnitude and the last case I had was 10 dead. Right now, they have a lot more  information we're getting right now. They're developing this to want to see who  else is in concert with this. They want to see every aspect. And then like  getting up to this news thing, and telling you everything they have. I got one  great thought about this. This FBI director called me. This guy is the real  deal. If this is terrorist related I will guarantee he will label as a terrorist  attack. And we have to wait until the investigation is totally done with.   
HANNITY: Mark Furhman, you can see if there were three to four this neighbor's report is right. In fact all these packages are being sent to this new location,  their new neighbors. They just moved in. Late night activity in their garage and  it turns out one of these people involved in the shooting. I would think the  first order of business or at least one of the top three. Find the other three  men that were in the garage late at night involved and find out what the  activity was in going on in that garage.   
MARK FURHMAN, FORMER LAPD DETECTIVE: Absolutely. And I would have the question, did the neighbor call the local law enforcement? And is there any record of the  call that went in that these guys are doing something suspicious late at night?    And when I say suspicious, it means that other people on the neighborhood aren't  engaged in the same activity. No different than a drug dealing, drug house where  you have a constant flow of people coming to the door staying for 30 seconds and  leaving. So that's the first thing.    But she was being delicate if she didn't call because she didn't want to call  because they're Middle Easterners and she didn't want to seem like she was  targeting them as terrorists. And you see this every time we have an incident  like this, regardless of any race, or sex, or religion. There's always somebody  that knew something that didn't call it in.   
HANNITY: Yeah.  
FURHMAN: But, yes. They want to find out everybody was there. And I think where they got the names first, you run utility checks because you're going to prepare  search warrants. You get utility checks, phone records and you have names that  pop up on there that are paying bills. It might be where they got the names and  they might have wanted to verify with the bodies that those people are one and  the same.   
HANNITY: All right. We're awaiting a police press conference as you can see on the other side of your screen.    Now, Fox has obtained new compelling tape that shows what was going on inside  the Inland Regional Center when this attack took place earlier today. You're  going to see a cop being as heroic as you'll ever see, watch this.       
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: You're not cool and I'm not walking out there. keep your hands where I can see them. All those that are these, you  know I got a weapon and try to relax. Thank you, thank you. Try to relax.  Everyone, try to relax. I'll take the bullet before you, that's for damn sure,  just be cool, OK?       
HANNITY: I'll take a bullet before you. That's for damn sure. Bo, you know, I know there's a lot of criticism but here we see the video that cop in Chicago,  you're on the program last week. I'll take a bullet before you, that's for damn  sure. That's what this guy do for a living.   
DIETL: Well, that's the majority of police officers there out there. They protect the people of this country and that's the epitome of what the cops are  all about. You've got a couple of bad guys that taint, it you can't paint with  one brush all the policeman across this country.   
HANNITY: You know, let's go back to the other video. We showed this in the last hour. There was a gentleman, in KABC Channel 7 in Los Angeles picked up this  video. He was actually following when the shoot out took place where the two  suspects were killed. Watch this video.       
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Gunshots. Those are gunshots.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Oh yeah.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Those are gunshots. What the. And look at there is gunfire right now. Oh, damn. They got him right there.       
HANNITY: This is roadsterwho saw that and took some of that video. They also reported hearing hundreds of shots going off as the police had a  confrontation with the two suspects that eventually died, that died on the scene  there, all right.    We got to take a quick break. When we comeback, we are awaiting a press  conference for law enforcement on this very, on the very latest in the  investigation into this deadly San Bernardino, California shooting. 14 dead, 17  injured. We'll have the very latest right here on the Fox News Channel.       
DAVID BOWDICH, FBI ASSISTANT DIRECTOR: I know one of the big questions that will come up repeatedly is, is this terrorism? And I am still not willing to say that  we know that for sure. We are definitely making some movements that it is a  possibility. We are making some adjustments to our investigation. It is a  possibility but we don't know that yet. And we're not willing to go down that  road yet.       
HANNITY: All right, that was earlier tonight at the press conference where the FBI Assistant Director In-Charge of the L.A. office David Bowdich saying they  cannot rule out terror. And we are waiting the next press conference on the  ground tonight in Redlands, California with the very latest about this presser  that we're awaiting is Jonathan Hunt.    Jonathan, what are we expecting? And what time do we expect this presser?   
HUNT: Well, we've been told they'll give us an update at the top of every hour. So by that metric, we should be just about 35 minutes away from an update which  we'll include. We are told the San Bernardino Police Department, once again, and  officials with the FBI. Now, obviously, the questions they are going to be asked  straight off the top of this, Sean, and the updates that we're all waiting for  is something on the suspects, a second ID And we have this first suspect IDed  by many in the media. And the name being confirmed is being in play by our  own Chief Intelligence Correspondent Catherine Herridge, that name being Syed  Farook.    Now, obviously, what we will want to hear and hopefully the FBI can give us is  more information on that person. We want to know if he is indeed the one who is  directly tied to the address that is now being searched by law enforcement  personnel in Redlands. That's about five miles from where the initial shooting  incident took place. There is a large law enforcement presence up there right  now.    Our own Dan Gallo has been shooting the video that you have seen of the tactical  robot making an approach to that property, are recording the sound as well of  that detonation that we heard which we believe was the tactical robot firing  what is known as a water shot at something that law enforcement personnel on the  ground felt was a suspicious device. All of that we hope will be explained to us  by the FBI when they address us again.    And then, obviously, the questions will be motive. We know that this gentleman  by the name of Syed Farook was employed as an Environmental Health Inspector  here in San Bernardino County. We also know that it was a Holiday Party, a  Christmas Party for health workers that was being held at the Regional Center  here where the shooting took place.    How does that all fit together? Was that always the target for the attack that  was carried out? Had that been planned to attack these people attending a  Holiday Party? Or, did something happen in a confrontation somehow inside that  party and one of the suspect, one of the dead suspects left, got an accomplice,  went back there saying that we did had a plan but let's carry out what we were  going to do right now.    We simply do not know the answers to those questions at the moment. We hope that  the FBI will be able to give us some of those answers when they next talk to us.  We hope that will be within the next 30 minutes.   
HANNITY: All right. Jonathan, quick followup to your last report where you mentioned this neighbor found it suspicious that these people moved in next  door, and all these packages were coming and late night activity going on. That  she would say three to four Middle Eastern men. I've got to believe because it  was one man, one woman, Syed Farook and this woman whose name has not been  released. I've got to believe that the FBI wants to talk to the other three  people that were seen by this woman, this neighbor in the house working in the  garage late at night.   
HUNT: You would imagine they are tracking down everybody there they can find, who is connected to that property and who is connected to this name of the  suspect put out there, Syed Farook.   
HANNITY: Hey, Jonathan, hang on one second.  
HUNT: So they're obviously they will be doing their due diligence right now. Yes, Sean.   
HANNITY: Jonathan, we're going to swing back to Adam Housley because apparently Adam has new information about this very topic.    Adam, what do you know?   
HOUSLEY: Yes. Got the phone with investigators telling me that they have made entry into that home in Redlands. They do -- has spoken with the neighbors who  said there were three or four individuals working on late in evening as I  reported last hour. And what they're telling me is, they are working on that the  theory obviously that there more and more people are at that location.    They also trying to figure out if that house was actually Syed Farook's location  or was it a cousin, was it a friend, is that why there are more people there?  And literally is I just hung up with them. Said that there inside, they're  hoping to find out more details once they're inside but they are working on the  information given to them by the neighbor, which we reported here about though  half an hour ago, Sean, that there were men working late in the evening and  receiving unnatural number of packages. And that's what there -- they are taking  that very seriously, Sean, as you could imagine.   
HANNITY: And by the way, Adam, just so people know. This is where the tactical robot that we now see on the other side of the screen. This is where it went in.  They also did a trip charge which resulted in the boom that Adam -- I'm sorry,  Jonathan Hunt also reported tonight.    So, I would imagine that they're going to be digging deep into who these men  are. What these packages where, where they were coming from and I'm sure we'll  be tracing via the post office, the UPS or FedEx or whatever.   
HOUSLEY: Yes, absolutely. And then, back to that boom we're talking about earlier, that water charge that comes out the end of that shotgun basically. I'm  told that that boom can -- that water charge makes that sound. So, it doesn't  mean that they detonated anything because it just means that they took something  out, so to speak.    But they took them a while to get into Redlands Home, just like it took them a  while to get into the SUV here as more unmarked cars coming here are going to  come by here in a second, still a lot of activity through these things.    And we're talking about three crime scenes. Yes, they are, you know, over a mile  and a half from the murders. The Redlands Home was five miles beyond that. But  you're talking about three very delicate crime scenes, Sean. And there's -- and  of course a lot of agencies here, state local and federal. So there's a lot to  go through. Then, you have the name situation and a lot of the other information  has been coming in. So I think it's obviously and they were very excited that  they were in the Redlands home when I spoke. We spoke with them.   
HANNITY: All right. It's going to be a very enlightening press conference. Thank you so much Adam Housely. We'll get back to Adam as the night unfolds here.    When we comeback, we are waiting as you can see on your screen a police press  conference on the deadly San Bernardino, California Shooting. 14 dead today, 17  injured.    Stay with the Fox News Channel for the very latest on the investigation.   
HANNITY: And this is a Fox News Alert and we are awaiting a press conference, a police press conference into the very latest on the investigation into the  deadly San Bernardino, California shooting. Jonathan Hunt is live on the ground  in California with the name now of the second suspect. Jonathan?   
JONATHAN HUNT, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Sean, Rick Sorrano who is a well-respected reporter with the L.A. Times just reporting that he has been told  by, directly by San Bernardino Police that the name of another suspect in this  incident isArdogan, I believe, it would be pronounce A-R-D-O-G-A-N  and according to the reporting of the L.A. Times that person is a 28-year-old  citizen of the Middle East in the nation of Qatar.    So that goes with the other name that is being put out there, Syed Farook who we  understand from the reporting of our own Catherine Herridge is a U.S. citizen.  But now, San Bernardino Police according to their reporting of the L.A. Times  are naming a 28-year-old Qatary citizen as another suspect in this incident,  Sean.   
HANNITY: All right, Jonathan, thank so you much.   Joining us now from Washington, from the American Islamic Forum for Democracy,  our friend Dr. Zuhdi Jasser.    Dr. Jasser, I know CAIR is going to hold the press conference. We are hearing,  again, the Washington Times, The New York Daily News reporting that Syed  Farook's father has spoken out. He was a developed Muslim.    Now, you hear that this woman is a 28-year-old citizen of Qatar. In everybody's  mind and the sheer volume of law enforcement and FBI resources being thrown into  this case leads one to think this now may very well be a terrorist attack. That  means now, people are going to look at names, people are going to look at the  location. If in fact this woman from Qatar and they're going to say is this  radical Islam? Your thoughts.   
ZUHDI JASSER, AMERICAN ISLAMIC FORUM FOR DEMOCRACY: Well, Sean, our hearts and prayers are with the families and I just, you know, I just get tongue tied  thinking about how many more of these do we need before American-Muslims stand  up and say, "We have a problem. We need an intervention."    I mean, I know we're still trying to get the facts and, you know, but  organizations are already putting out press releases saying that this is just  some psychiatric issue or doesn't represent. Well, listen.   
HANNITY: No, they don't know that.  
JASSER: If we want to -- I know exactly.  
HANNITY: We can't make a definite statement that it is terror but, again, we're trying to get to the bottom of this.   
JASSER: Yeah.  
HANNITY: And we have the report, I find it very interesting what the neighbor was saying, people up late at night, a lot of packages going to the homes. I  don't know if it's connected to the Christmas Party, where this fight that took  place, they seemed prepared for some type of attack.    They didn't leave the area, they could have gotten away. They could have changed  vehicles. They could have separated. That tells me that maybe they are willing  to go down in this battle.    But I think a lot of questions are going to be raised especially in light of the  question that is now before the American people and the president's insistence  against the advice of his director of National Intelligence and as FBI director,  and is assisted FBI director. Another intelligence official that he still wants  to bring in Syrian refugees even though law enforcement telling us that ISIS  might infiltrate the refugee population. I got to assume that a 28-year-old  citizen from Qatar is going to, you know, reignite that debate. No?   
JASSER: Well, it's going to reignite the debate but also reignite the fact that we're at war and ISIS is infiltrating the viral minds through ideology and that  this is a home grown. It sounds that these two did it as part of an ISIS  operation.    By the way, it is seeming more like terror when you have more than one  individual and it's an operation that they did. And they're looking at softer  and softer targets because they want -- this is the power of a synchronize  warfare.    They want to make America, I mean, we're already seeing some tweets online,  Sean, that say America burning and they're trying to. ISIS is whether they did  it or not starting to take credit for it because their social media is about  trying to destroy our society from within so that the freedom, the appeal of  America is no longer. There so, the Sunnis can start going back to Syria and  they can rip us apart.   
HANNITY: And I mentioned this later, I'm sorry, earlier. As we were debating the issue of Syrian refugees what do we learned? We learned that there are 1,000  plus FBI probes into ISIS sympathizers in this country.    Now, new statistics came out today from George Washington University. What did  they report? 71 people in America have been arrested nationwide for alleged  connections to ISIS. 13 of them from New York, 11 from Minnesota and around 250  Americans have tried to travel or successfully reach Syria or Iraq to join ISIS.    So the FBI is telling us ISIS is here. The national director of intelligence is  saying that, "Yeah, ISIS is likely to infiltrate the Syrian refugee community.  The FBI director saying we can't possibly bet them all in the right way".    Are we too open with people that come from societies where there are huge  cultural divide with our constitution and our belief in liberty, those that may  live under Sharia law?   
JASSER: Well, Sean, as long as the conversation doesn't include a vetting of political Islam. I mean the reason I'm in Washington right now is we have a  summit of reform minded Muslims that is coming together.    We planned this from months ago and the sad thing is that there's an attack  every few weeks now because we're doing nothing to vet against the ideology of  political Islam which is a political ideology of what Islamic state supremacism  over western freedom ideology and.   
HANNITY: But there is a class of cultures, Zuhdi. There is a definitive class of cultures. This is just a fact. If you grow up under Sharia law where women can't  drive, four male eye witnesses needed for rape. They can't be seen in public  without a male relative all of the stringent requirements for dress for women  and treatment of women and minorities, et cetera. If you grow up in that  culture, it is the antithesis of what our constitutional right provides every  citizen in America. Do we have to take in that conflict when we allow people  from Qatar or those societies to come into America?   
JASSER: Because the bigger part of this battle is that conveyor beltthat's radicalizing hundreds of millions of 1.6 billion in the planet. If we are going  -- you're going to surrender to that ideology if you close the walls and say,  "America isn't about freedom and liberty". If you want to take side not against  all Islam but within the house of this...   
HANNITY: But how do you -- here's the question. How do you ascertain? How do you get into the minds and hearts of the 10,000 Syrian refugees were told that 15 --  13 percent to 15 percent according to surveys sympathize with ISIS? How do you  get into minds and hearts of those people and ascertain who comes here with pure  intentions for a better life for them and their family, and who wants to kill  us? And why should Americans take the risk? And why is the president willing to  gamble with the lives of Americans?   
JASSER: Sean, you're right. I mean, as my family in Syria they know who is coming from the north of ISIS areas that are jihadists versus those that want  freedom. I mean, the refugees, the vast majority of them are keeping Assad not  necessarily ISIS. And the bottom line is, is that there is an internal battle  going on which is not just about Islamism versus freedom but it also is about  Assad and dictatorship so America to be on the side of good needs to embrace  those Muslims.    Just like the cold war, we embraced Russians and Vietnamese and others that  wanted freedom and yet we realized that within them was an ideological enemy  that we didn't want to bring on board. The problem is nobody in our government  wants to engage reformists to help us vet them and...   
HANNITY: And Zuhdi, I appreciate everything you're saying and I know where your heart is, and I have been critical that there are not more Muslims like yourself  that speak out against the hijacking of Islam and you're right. But the numbers  of radical sympathizers are way too high and the voices of moderates like  yourself are -- well, there are some. There is not enough but I got to run. I  don't mean to cut you off, my friend.   
JASSER: Thank you.  
HANNITY: All right. We are awaiting a press conference by the police on the latest on today's shooting in San Bernardino, California. 14 dead, 17 injured.  We'll have the latest here as we continue on Fox News Channel.   
HANNITY: And welcome back to Fox, this is a Fox News Alert. We are awaiting a police press conference into the investigation of the deadly San Bernardino,  California shooting. Just moments ago, loud bangs were heard at the Inland  Regional Center. That's where police were reportedly dealing with possible  explosive devices.    As you might remember that's where the initial attack took place earlier today.  Live on the ground with the latest information from California is our own Adam  Housley. Adam?   
ADAM HOUSLEY, FOX NEWS CORRESPONDENT: Yes, Sean. We've been told out with those loud bangs were the third of three devices that have now been disrupted so to  speak just at that location alone. So with that, we've been talking about the  location here where the shooting happen which is one mile away, we were talking  about the house in Redlands, there more than 14 people were murdered and the  others were injured.    They have found three devices that they believe could have been pipe bombs. They  won't confirm officially that yet but they have destroyed three devices there.  The third one just happened, Sean, and what they're told obviously, there's --  as you can tell, still going through that scene. So these are still three very  -- well, two very active crime scenes and a third one is a potential crime scene  in Redland, Sean.    So this investigation as we've been talking about all night going into a lot of  directions. There are a lot of things that they're looking into and they are  still having a deal with the possibility of pipe bombs and other things that  threaten their security and safety as they go forward with the investigation,  Sean.   
HANNITY: All right. So we're really looking at three different areas. The Redlands Home which we have been talking about with Jonathan, we have the  shooting area where the two suspects were killed and they've been showing great  care all throughout the night although I think they pulled back in last half  hour or so and of course the Inland Regional Center where the initial shooting  took place. Those are the three areas and they're still at all three, correct?   
HOUSLEY: Correct. And what surprised me a bit is I didn't realize -- we known that they'd found at one suspicious device, let's call it that, at the center  which is a mile and a half from where I'm at, where I started today. And we  don't that they found two more so that's three. And so that tells us obviously  that still very active there as well.    We know that the Office of Investigation was going to be going on there but we  didn't realize it was still that type of investigation where they were still  dealing with suspicious devices over there and we're talking about hours after  that murder, all those murders took place.    As you mentioned, it has dial back here a bit. I can step back and show that  they're still obviously the truck or the SUV is still down there. There are  lights. There are still teams down there obviously. They have main entry into  the SUV and as I reported about 20 minutes ago, they were excited to finally get  into the home in Redlands where they're hoping to find more investigative, you  know, more leads so to speak or things that might help them in this case, Sean.    As you know, as talk about there is a massive contingent law enforcement here  from all over and the FBI is quietly leading this entire thing.   
HANNITY: All right. Adam, thank you so much for that report and all your hard work tonight and your great reporting, we all appreciate it. Thank you so much.    Now, coming up, police scheduled to hold a presser on the very latest into the  investigation into this shooting, 14 dead, 17 injured. Stay with the Fox News  Channel.   
HANNITY: And this is the Fox News Alert. This is our continuing coverage of the shooting in Riverside, California, San Bernardino, California. And the group  care, the -- is holding a press conference. Apparently, they have one of the  family members, I assume of Syed Farook who has been identified as one of the  suspects that was killed earlier by police and let's go to this presser and just  dip in and check it.       
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Offering our, you know, solidarity and our remorse for everything that's been ongoing as well as some leaders from our Muslim community  and a relative of the suspect. So I would like to introduce first our CAIR  Executive Director, Hussam Ayloush.   
HUSSAM AYLOUSH, CAIR EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR: Thank you. Good evening everyone. My name is Hussam Ayloush. It's H-U-S-S-A-M as in Mary, last name is Ayloush,  A-Y-L-O-U-S-H and I'm the Executive Director of the CAIR, the Council on  American Islamic Relations for the greater Los Angeles area.    On behalf of the American Muslim community and especially the Southern  California Muslim community, on behalf of CAIR, the Council on American Islamic  Relations, we unequivocally condemn the horrific acts that happened today. And  we stand in solidarity with fellow Americans as we offer our condolences, our  heartfelt prayers and condolences to the injured, to the families of those who  have been killed.    We stand in solidarity inany possible ideology or mindset that  could have led to such horrific act. There is absolutely nothing that could  justify and we stand in mourning and sadness for what happened. And we pray for  the quick recovery of those who are injured. Thank you very much.   
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Thank you Hussam. Next, I would like to invite the Religious Director of the Islamic Society of Orange County, Dr. Muzammil  Siddiqi.   
MUZAMMIL SIDDIQI, RELIGIOUS DIRECTOR OF ISLAMIC SOCIETY IN ORANGE COUNTY: Good evening, my name is Muzammil Siddiqi. I'm the Religious Director of the Islamic  Society of Orange County and the Chairman of the Shura Council of the Southern  California. Shura Council represent most of the mosques of Southern California  from Santa Barbara to San Diego.    On behalf of our communities, I want to express our sadness and sorrow on this  tragedy that happened in San Bernardino, our hearts go to the victims and their  families and the people who are injured.    We pray to God to bless them and to give comfort to the people who are in  difficulty at this time. We are with them. We're in solidarity with them. And  also, I want to condemn this action. This action of violence, it is horrible  violence we have condemned all violence, everywhere because human life is  precious and we respect and honor the human life.    We would like to see that our law enforcement will take full investigation and  find out more detailsand the people behind that. And they will -- they  should be brought to justice. That is what we expect and we hope it will happen.  And at the same time, I would urge everyone to please do not implicate Islam or  Muslims because what -- whosoever had done that, our faith has nothing to do  with that. Our faith is against this kind of behavior. Thank you.   
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Thank you Dr. Siddiqi. Next, I would like to bring up the.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Could you spell his name?  
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Oh, can you spell your name sir?  
SIDDIQI: Muzammil Siddiqi, M-U-Z-A-M-M-I-L, Siddiqi, S-I-D-D-I-Q-I.  
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Thank you. Next, we would like to bring up the brother in-law of the suspect, Farhan Khan to give a few remarks.   
FARHAN KHAN, BROTHER-IN-LAW OF THE SUSPECT: My name is Farhan it's F- A-R-H-A-N. My last name is Khan, K-H-A-N. And I just cannot express it how sad I am for,  you know, what happened today. I mean, my condolences to, you know, the people  who lost their life.    I am very sad that, you know, people lost their lives and there are victims out  there. I wish, and speak to them and again, I am in shock. That something like  this could happen. That's all I have. I hope everybody understands and, you  know, everybody get recover much faster, whatever the victims are there. Thanks.   
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: When was the last time you talk to Syed?  
KHAN: I mean, I spoke to - about like a week ago with him. Yeah.  
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Was there anything that he's religious person?  
KHAN: You know, there's no comment. I mean, investigation is going on. You would know what it is. I have no idea. I have no idea why would he do that? Why would  he do something like this? I have absolutely no idea. I am in shock myself.   
AYLOUSH: I had a chance to speak with Mr. Khan before and he truly doesn't feel he is informed enough or anyone is informed enough to comment because we don't  know the motives. Is it work, rage related? Is it mental illness? Is it extreme  ideology?    At this point, it's really unknown to us and it's too soon for us to speculate  and he feels comfortable sticking to his -- he chose to be here to share his  family's feelings, sadness and sorrow as all Americans are tonight and today.    So let's keep it that way for the time being until more information is available  and he promised to be as available as necessary as more information is  available. So thank you for respecting his choice at this point.           
AYLOUSH: I ask and truly he feels at this point he'd rather stick to that comment just for the interest of the investigation to be fair, we really want to  get to the bottom of it.    We don't want to undermine the efforts of law enforcement at this point by  making any comment that could mislead the investigators or law enforcement that  will be a great disservice done to the victims and their families. So let's  respect that for the time being and we appreciate that from your end.           
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Is it base on your religion?  
KHAN: At this point I don't want to say anything.  
AYLOUSH: He doesn't been informed. He doesn't know has been shot.  
KHAN: The reason I'm here is, you know, I just wanted to say that I am actually is -- the reason I'm here is, you know, is to talk to the victims and to express  my family how sad they are of what happened, drastically. I mean, you know,  that's why I'm here. I mean, don't ask me how, what he is, what he was doing,  how he is? I mean, I don't want to get into all of this. Please.       
KHAN: Sorry?  
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: Did the rest of the family ask you to come to be the spokesperson?   
KHAN: Yes.  
UNIDENTIFIED MALE: Do they children together?  
UNIDENTIFIED FEMALE: If it's OK, at this point, I will request if we can just hold off on those questions after the conference. I really appreciate it. Next  we will have Reverend Sarah.   
